Washington statutes.
RCW 16.68.080

Expiration of license—Revocation.

Any license or permit issued under this chapter shall expire on the thirtieth day of June next subsequent to the date of issue, and may be sooner revoked by the director or his or her authorized representative for violations of this chapter. Any licensee or permittee under this chapter shall have the right to demand a hearing before the director before a revocation is made permanent.

[ 2011 c 336 s 440; 1949 c 100 s 8; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3142-8.]